Utah statutes.
73-10c-3.   Water Development Coordinating Council created -- Purpose -- Members.

(1) (a)  There is created within the Department of Natural Resources a Water Development Coordinating Council.  The council comprises:

(i)  the director of the Division of Water Resources;

(ii)  the executive secretary of the Water Quality Board;

(iii)  the executive secretary of the Drinking Water Board;

(iv)  the director of the Housing and Community Development Division or the director's designee; and

(v)  the state treasurer or the treasurer's designee.

(b)  The council shall choose a chair and vice chair from among its own members.

(c)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(i)  Section 63A-3-106;

(ii)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(iii)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(2)  The purposes of the council are to:

(a)  coordinate the use and application of the funds available to the state to give financial assistance to political subdivisions of this state so as to promote the conservation, development, treatment, restoration, and protection of the waters of this state;

(b)  promote the coordination of the financial assistance programs administered by the state and the use of the financing alternative most economically advantageous to the state and its political subdivisions;

(c)  promote the consideration by the Board of Water Resources, Drinking Water Board, and Water Quality Board of regional solutions to the water and wastewater needs of individual political subdivisions of this state; and

(d)  assess the adequacy and needs of the state and its political subdivisions with respect to water-related infrastructures and advise the governor and the Legislature on those funding needs.

